Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB546.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1505(e) introductory paragraph of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 1505. Learners' permits.* * *(e) Authorization to test for driver's license and junior driver's license.--A person with a learner's permit is authorized to take the examination for a regular or junior driver's license for the class of vehicle for which a permit is held. [Before] Except as provided under subsection (e.1), before a person under the age of 18 years may take the examination for a junior driver's license, including a Class M license to operate a motorcycle, the minor must:123456789101112131415161718 * * *(e.1) Military exception for learner's permits.--For purposes of determining compliance with subsection (e)(1) and (2), the department shall credit the time period during which a learner's permit from another state is held and the number of hours completed of practical driving experience by a minor in the other state, if:(1) The minor is a family member of an active duty service member in the military, including a reserve component or National Guard.(2) The minor resides in this Commonwealth with the active duty service member.(3) The minor has a valid learner's permit issued by another state.(4) The department has issued a learner's permit to the individual.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0546PN0547 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718